District of Columbia statutes.
1-15-7

BUILDING AND ZONING REGULATION ADMINISTRATION

I. Purpose

The purpose of this reorganization plan is to transfer all functions associated with the administration and enforcement of the District of Columbia building and zoning codes from the Department of Housing and Community Development to the Department of Licenses, Investigations and Inspections.

II. Functions

The following functions are hereby transferred to the Director of the Department of Licenses, Investigations and Inspections:

(a) To administer and enforce the statutes, codes and regulations governing the construction, conversion, repair and alteration of buildings in the District of Columbia, including all appurtenances such as walls, fences and signs, and including all equipment installed in or on buildings or structures such as electrical, elevator, plumbing, refrigeration, gas, boiler and pressure vessel equipment;

(b) To administer and enforce the Energy Conservation Code of 1979, D.C. Law 3-39, as it amends the building, plumbing and electrical codes;

(c) To administer and enforce the Architectural Barriers Act of 1980, D.C. Law 3-118, as it amends the building, plumbing, electrical and elevator codes;

(d) To administer and enforce Sections 2, 5, and 6 of D.C. Law 1-64, the D.C. Applications Insurance Implementation Act, relating to permit requirements under the flood insurance program;

(e) To administer and enforce the zoning statutes, codes and regulations governing land use, the height, area and use of buildings, and subdivision of all private land and condominiums;

(f) To provide technical review and comment on applications filed with the Board of Zoning Adjustment; to maintain a register of approved non-conforming uses;

(g) To process applications to lease public space under the provisions of the Public Space Utilization Act, Public Law 90-598;

(h) To inspect buildings and facilities for compliance with building and zoning regulations in response to applications for certificates of occupancy and/or licensing requirements;

(i) To recommend to appropriate officials and agencies any amendments to the zoning regulations which would resolve problems or conflicts in administration;

(j) To recommend, in consultation with the Building Code Advisory Committee established by Commissioner’s Order 72-173 and with appropriate officials and agencies, amendments to the building codes; to provide staff support to the Building Code Advisory Committee;

(k) To determine the compliance of new materials, appliances and systems with existing building codes, based on tests by nationally accepted testing laboratories, and issue certificates of approval as appropriate;

(l) To make available to the public information about building and zoning code requirements;

(m) To maintain master files and records of approved building plans and permits.

III. Transfers

All positions, personnel, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available relating to the duties and functions herein are hereby transferred to the Department of Licenses, Investigations and Inspections.

IV. Organization

The Director of the Department of Licenses, Investigations and Inspections is authorized to organize the personnel and property transferred herein within any organizational unit of the Department as the Director deems appropriate.

V. Effective Date

The provisions of this Plan shall become effective pursuant to the requirements of Section 422 (12) of Public Law 93-128, or on a date thereafter to be determined by executive order of the Mayor.